Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2602
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to promote the growth and development of a comprehensive child care system which meets the needs of families in Nebraska by encouraging high-quality, affordable, and accessible child care services that are educationally and developmentally appropriate. The Legislature finds that existing child care resources are inadequate to meet the need for services and that high-quality services can substantially increase the well-being of children and families.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 2.